California statutes. Civil Code
A third flexible feature of the adjustable-payment, adjustable-rate mortgage loan is that the outstanding principal loan balance (the total amount you owe) may be increased from time to time. This situation, called “negative amortization,” can occur when rising interest rates make the monthly payment too small to cover the interest due on the loan. The difference between the monthly payment and the actual amount due in interest is added to the outstanding loan balance. 

Under the terms of this mortgage, you as a borrower would always have the option of either incurring additions to the amount you owe on the loan or voluntarily increasing your monthly payments beyond the 7.5 percent annual limit to an amount needed to pay off the rising interest costs.

Continual increases
in the outstanding loan balance may cause a situation in which the loan balance is not entirely paid off at the end of the 30-year loan term. If this occurs, you may elect in writing to repay the outstanding principal all at once, or with a series of fixed payments at a fixed rate of interest for up to 10 years.

The final flexible feature of the adjustable-payment, adjustable-rate mortgage loan is that you may lengthen the loan term from 30 to up to 40 years. Extending the loan term will lower your monthly payment slightly less than they would have been had the loan term not been extended. 
II. INDEX
Adjustments to the interest rate of an adjustable-payment, adjustable-rate mortgage loan must correspond directly to the movement of an index which is selected, but not controlled, by
the lender. Any adjustments to the interest rate are subject to limitations provided in the loan contract.

If the index moves down, the lender must reduce the interest rate by at least the decrease in the index. If the index moves up, the lender has the right to increase the interest rate by that amount. Although making such an increase is optional by the lender, you should be aware that the lender has this right and may be contractually obligated to exercise it.

The index used is [Name and description of index to be used for applicant’s loan, initial index value (if known) and date of initial index value, a source or sources where the index may be readily obtained by the borrower, and the high and low index rates during the previous calendar year]. 
III. KEY PROVISIONS OF [Name of Institution]
ADJUSTABLE-PAYMENT, ADJUSTABLE-RATE MORTGAGE LOAN
The following information is a summary of the basic terms on the mortgage loan being offered to you. This summary is intended for reference purposes only. Important information relating specifically to your loan will be contained in the loan agreement.

[Provide a summary of basic terms of the loan, including the loan term, the frequency of rate changes, the frequency of payment changes, the maximum rate change at any one time, the maximum rate change over the life of the loan, the maximum annual payment change, and whether additions to the principal loan balance are possible, in the following format:]

LOAN TERM

FREQUENCY OF RATE CHANGES

FREQUENCY OF PAYMENT CHANGES 
IV. HOW YOUR ADJUSTABLE-PAYMENT, ADJUSTABLE-RATE MORTGAGE LOAN WOULD WORK
A. INITIAL INTEREST RATE

The initial interest rate offered by [Name of Institution] on your adjustable-payment, adjustable-rate mortgage loan will be established and disclosed to you on [commitment date, etc.] based on market conditions at that time.

[Insert a short description of each of the key provisions of the loan to be offered to the borrower, using headings where appropriate.] 
B. NOTICE OF PAYMENT ADJUSTMENTS

[Name of Institution] will send you notice of an
adjustment to the payment amount at least 60 days before it becomes effective. [Describe what information the notice will contain.]
C. PREPAYMENT PENALTY

You may prepay your adjustable-payment, adjustable-rate mortgage in whole or in part without penalty at any time during the term of the loan. 
D. FEES

You will be charged fees by [Name of Institution] and by other persons in connection with the origination of your loan. The association will give you an estimate of these fees after receiving your loan application. However, you will not be charged any costs of fees in connection with any regularly scheduled adjustment to the interest rate, the payment, the outstanding principal loan balance, or the loan term. 
V. EXAMPLE OF OPERATION OF YOUR ADJUSTABLE-PAYMENT, ADJUSTABLE-RATE MORTGAGE LOAN
[Set out an example of the operation of the mortgage loan, including the use of a table. In at least one of the examples, create a situation showing how negative amortization could occur.] 
(d) At least 60 days prior to the due date of a monthly installment to be revised due to a change in the interest rate, notice shall be mailed to the borrower of the following:

(1) The base index.

(2) The most recently published index at the date of the change in the rate. 

(3) The interest rate in effect
as a result of the change.

(4) The amount of the unpaid principal balance.

(5) If the interest scheduled to be paid on the due date exceeds the amount of the installment, a statement to that effect, including the amount of excess and extent of borrower options as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b).

(6) The amount of the revised monthly installment.

(7) The borrower’s right to prepayment under paragraph (8) of subdivision (b). 

(8) The address and telephone number of the office of the lender to which inquiries may be made.

(e) As used in this section:

(1) “Base index” means the last published index at the date of the note.

(2) “Base index rate” means the interest rate initially applicable to the loan as specified in the note.

(3) “Graduated Payment Adjustable Mortgage Loan” means a loan on which the monthly payments begin at a level lower than that necessary to pay off the remaining principal balance over an amortization period of not less than 30 years. During a period the length of which is fixed at loan origination (the “graduation period”), the scheduled payments gradually rise to a level sufficient to pay off the remaining principal balance over the stipulated amortization period. Limitations on the rate of increase in the scheduled payments due both to graduation and to changes in the interest rate are also fixed at loan origination.

(4) “Note”
means the note or other loan contract evidencing an adjustable-payment, adjustable-rate mortgage loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1079, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1916.8.

Any lender may make, purchase or participate in a renegotiable rate mortgage loan under this section if the loan complies with the provisions of this section pertaining to one- to four-family home loans.

(a) For purposes of this section, a renegotiable rate mortgage loan is a loan issued for a term of three, four or five years, secured by a long-term mortgage or deed of trust of up to 30 years, and automatically renewable at equal intervals except as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b). The loan must be repayable in equal monthly installments of principal and interest during the
loan term, in an amount at least sufficient to amortize a loan with the same principal and at the same interest rate over the remaining term of the mortgage or deed of trust. Only one of the indices described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall be used and no other index shall be used during the term of the mortgage or deed of trust securing the loan. At renewal, no change other than in the interest rate may be made in the terms or conditions of the initial loan. Prepayment in full or in part of the loan balance secured by the mortgage or deed of trust may be made without penalty at any time after the beginning of the minimum notice period for the first renewal, or at any earlier time specified in the loan contract.

(b) Interest rate changes at renewal shall be determined as follows:

(1) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (a) the interest rate offered at renewal shall
reflect the movement, in reference to the date of the original loan, of an index, which may be either (i) the contract interest rate on the purchase of previously occupied homes in the most recent monthly national average mortgage rate index for all major lenders published by the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, or (ii) the weighted average cost of funds for the 11th District Savings and Loan Associations as computed by the Federal Home Loan Bank of San Francisco; provided that a lender may extend the initial terms of loans for a period less than six months so that they may mature on the same date three, four or five years after the end of such period of extension, in which case the interest rate offered at renewal shall reflect the movement of the index from the end of such period so that loans may be grouped as though all loans of such group had originated at the end of the extension period.

(2) The maximum rate increase or decrease shall be
12 of 1 percentage point per year multiplied by the number of years in the loan term, with a maximum increase or decrease of 5 percentage points over the life of the mortgage or deed of trust. The lender may offer a borrower a renegotiable rate mortgage loan with maximum annual and total interest rate decreases smaller than the maximum set out in this paragraph, except that in such a case the maximum annual and total interest rate increases offered shall not exceed the maximum annual and total decreases set out in the loan contract.

(3) Interest rate decreases from the previous loan term shall be mandatory. Interest rate increases are optional with the lender, but the lender may obligate itself to a third party to take the maximum increase permitted by this paragraph.

(c) The
borrower may not be charged any costs or fees in connection with the renewal of such loan.

(d) At least 90 days before the due date of the loan, the lender shall send written notification in the following form to the borrower: 
NOTICE
Your loan with [name of lender], secured by a [mortgage/deed of trust] on property located at [address], is due and payable on [90 days from the date of notice].

If you do not pay by that date, your loan will be renewed automatically for ____ years, upon the same terms and conditions as the current loan, except that the interest rate will be ____%. (See accompanying Truth-In-Lending statement for further credit information.)

Your monthly payment,
based on that rate, will be $____, beginning with the payment due on ____, 19_.

You may pay off the entire loan or a part of it without penalty at any time. 

If you have questions about this notice, please contact [title and telephone number of lender’s employee].
(e) An applicant for a renegotiable rate mortgage loan must be given, at the time he or she requests an application, a disclosure notice in the following form: 
INFORMATION ABOUT THE RENEGOTIABLE-RATE MORTGAGE
You have received an application form for a renegotiable-rate mortgage (“RRM”). The RRM differs from the fixed-rate mortgage with which you may be familiar. In the
fixed-rate mortgage the length of the loan and the length of the underlying mortgage are the same, but in the RRM the loan is short-term (3–5 years) and is automatically renewable for a period equal to the mortgage (up to 30 years). Therefore, instead of having an interest rate that is set at the beginning of the mortgage and remains the same, the RRM has an interest rate that may increase or decrease at each renewal of the short-term loan. This means that the amount of your monthly payment may also increase or decrease.

The term of the RRM loan is ____ years, and the length of the underlying mortgage is ____ years. The initial loan term may be up to six months longer than later terms.

The lender must offer to renew the loan, and the only loan provision that may be changed at renewal is the interest rate. The interest rate offered at renewal is based on changes in an index rate. The index used is (either of the following
statements shall be given): [computed monthly by the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, an agency of the federal government. The index is based on the national average contract rate for all major lenders for the purchase of previously occupied, single-family homes.] [the weighted average cost of savings, borrowings and Federal Home Loan Bank advances to California members of the Federal Home Loan Bank Board of San Francisco as computed from statistics tabulated by the Federal Home Loan Bank of San Francisco. The index used is computed by the Federal Home Loan Bank of San Francisco.]

At renewal, if the index has moved higher than it was at the beginning of the mortgage, the lender has the right to offer a renewal of the loan at an interest rate equaling the original interest rate plus the increase in the index rate. This is the maximum increase permitted to the lender. Although taking such an increase is optional with the lender, you should be aware that the lender has
this right and may become contractually obligated to exercise it.

If the index has moved down, the lender must at renewal reduce the original interest rate by the decrease in the index rate. No matter how much the index rate increases or decreases, THE LENDER, AT RENEWAL, MAY NOT INCREASE OR DECREASE THE INTEREST RATE ON YOUR RRM LOAN BY AN AMOUNT GREATER THAN ____ OF ONE PERCENTAGE POINT PER YEAR OF THE LOAN, AND THE TOTAL INCREASE OR DECREASE OVER THE LIFE OF THE MORTGAGE MAY NOT BE MORE THAN ____ PERCENTAGE POINTS.

As the borrower, you have the right to decline the lender’s offer of renewal. If you decide not to renew, you will have to pay off the remaining balance of the mortgage. Even if you decide to renew, you have the right to prepay the loan in part or in full without penalty at any time after the beginning of the minimum notice period for the first renewal. To give you enough time to make this decision, the
lender, 90 days before renewal, will send a notice stating the due date of the loan, the new interest rate and the monthly payment amount. If you do not respond to the notice, the loan will be automatically renewed at the new rate. You will not have to pay any fees or charges at renewal time.

The maximum interest rate increase at the first renewal is ____ percentage points. On a $50,000 mortgage with a loan term of ____ years and an original interest rate of [lender’s current commitment rate] percent, this rate change would increase the monthly payment (principal and interest) from $____ to $____. Using the same example, the highest rate you might have to pay over the life of the mortgage would be ____ percent, and the lowest would be ____ percent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1139, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1916.9.

(a) Every lender who offers a renegotiable rate mortgage loan pursuant to Section 1916.8 to a borrower who occupies or intends to occupy the property which is security for the loan shall also offer to such borrower a fixed rate mortgage loan in the same amount with a term of at least 29 years.

(b) Nothing in this section shall require that the terms of such alternative loans, including the rates of interest thereon, must be the same as those terms offered with regard to the fixed-payment adjustable-rate loan or the renegotiable rate mortgage loan also offered.

(c) This section does not apply to any lender who makes less than 10 loans per year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1139, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1916.11.

Notwithstanding any other remedy a borrower may have based on an alleged failure to comply with Sections 1916.5 through 1916.9, the lien of the mortgage or deed of trust shall be valid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 274, Sec. 2.   Effective August 27, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

1916.12.

(a) The Legislature finds that the economic environment of financial institutions has become increasingly volatile as a result of regulatory revisions enacted by the United States Congress and federal agencies including, but not necessarily limited to, the Comptroller of the Currency, the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, Federal Reserve Board, and the Depository Institutions Deregulation Committee. The Legislature further finds that deposit rate ceilings are being phased out while the cost of and competition for funds have escalated. It is the purpose of this section to maintain the quality of competition between state-licensed and federally regulated financial institutions in the field of mortgage lending, as well as promote the convenience, advantage and best interests of California residents in their pursuit of adequate and
 available housing. In order to remain competitive and provide the optimum housing environment for the citizens of California, state institutions require the ability to respond in a timely manner to changes in mortgage lending parameters initiated at the federal level. Local regulatory guidelines must promote continued parity between the state and federal levels in order to avoid creation of discriminatory burdens upon state institutions and to protect interests held by California citizens. It is the intent of the Legislature to eliminate past and prevent future inequities between state and federal financial institutions doing business in the State of California by creating a sensitive and responsive mortgage parity procedure.

(b) The Secretary of Business and Consumer Services or the secretary’s designee as defined by subdivision (c) of Section 1918.5, shall have the authority to prescribe rules and regulations extending to lenders who make loans upon the security of residential real property any right, power, privilege or duty relating to mortgage instruments that is equivalent to authority extended to federally regulated financial institutions by federal statute or regulation.

(c) In order to grant equivalent mortgage lending authority to state financial institutions to that which has been extended to federal financial institutions, the secretary or the secretary’s designee shall adopt such regulations within 60 days of the effective date of the statute or regulation extending the comparable right, power, privilege, or duty to federally regulated financial institutions.

(d) The provisions of Sections 1916.5, 1916.6, 1916.7, 1916.8, and 1916.9, and any other provisions of law relating to the requirements for changes in the rate of interest on loans, shall not be applicable to loans made pursuant to the provisions of this section and regulations promulgated thereunder.

(e) Any regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall expire on January 1 of the second succeeding year following the end of the calendar year in which the regulation was promulgated. Subsequent amendments to these regulations cannot extend this expiration date.

(f) The amendments made to this section
 by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 12.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Shared Appreciation Loans [1917. - 1917.006.]

1917.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Contingent deferred interest” means the sum a borrower is obligated to pay to a lender pursuant to the documentation of a shared appreciation loan as a share of (1) the appreciation in the value of the security property (2) rents and profits attributable to the subject property, or (3) both.

(b) A “shared appreciation loan” means any loan made upon the security of an interest in real property which additionally obligates the borrower to pay to the lender contingent deferred interest pursuant
to the loan documentation. “Shared appreciation loan” does not include any loan made upon the security of an interest in real property containing one to four residential units at least one of which at the time the loan is made is or is to be occupied by the borrower.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 652, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.001.

The relationship of the borrower and the lender in a shared appreciation loan transaction is that of debtor and creditor and shall not be, or be construed to be, a joint venture, equity venture, partnership, or other relationship.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 652, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.002.

A shared appreciation loan shall not be subject to any provisions of this code or the Financial Code which limits the interest rate or change of interest rate of variable, adjustable, or renegotiable interest instruments, or which requires particular language or provisions in security instruments securing variable, adjustable, or renegotiable rate obligations or in evidences of such debts except for those specifically imposed by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1917.010) or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1917.320) for loans subject to those chapters. This section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 652, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.003.

The lien or liens of a deed or deeds of trust securing a shared appreciation loan shall include and secure the principal amount of the shared appreciation loan, and all interest, whether accrued or to be accrued, including all amounts of contingent deferred interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1416, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.004.

(a) The lien of a shared appreciation loan, including the principle amount and all interest, whether accrued or to be accrued, and all amounts of contingent deferred interest, shall attach from the time of the recordation of the deed of trust securing the loan, and the lien, including the lien of the interest accrued, or to be accrued, and of the contingent deferred interest, shall have priority over any other lien or encumbrance affecting the property encumbered by the shared appreciation deed of trust which is recorded after the time of recordation of the shared appreciation deed of trust. Nothing in this section shall
preclude a junior or subordinate lien to the deed of trust securing the shared appreciation loan.

(b) Any deed of trust that acts as security for a shared appreciation loan shall indicate on the document that the deed of trust secures a shared appreciation loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 652, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.005.

Lenders shall be exempt from the usury provisions of Article XV of the California Constitution with respect to shared appreciation loan transactions. This section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 652, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.006.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Shared appreciation loan” means, in addition to the meaning defined in Section 1917, a loan that obligates the borrower to pay to the lender contingent deferred interest pursuant to the loan documentation and that is made upon the security of an interest in real property that is an owner-occupied residence in compliance with all of the following conditions:

(1) The loan is made by, and all contingent deferred interest paid with respect to the loan is used by, a local public entity to
provide financial assistance in the acquisition of housing that is affordable to persons and families of low or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(2) The loan is made or acquired with assets of the local public entity other than the proceeds of a bond meeting the requirements of Section 143 of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(3) The loan documentation assures that the obligation to pay contingent deferred interest is subject to a superior right of the borrower, upon termination of the loan, to receive repayment of money paid by the borrower for purchase of the security property (including downpayment, installment payments of mortgage principal, escrow fees, transfer taxes, recording fees, brokerage commissions and similar costs of acquisition actually paid by the borrower) and money paid by the borrower for capital
improvements to the security property, plus not less than the legal rate of interest on those cash payments.

(4) The loan documentation assures that the amount of contingent deferred interest shall not exceed that percentage of the appreciation in appraised fair market value of the security property that equals the local public entity’s proportionate share of the total initial equity in the security property. The amount of the total initial equity and of the local public entity’s share of the initial equity shall be agreed upon by the borrower and the local public entity at the time of executing the shared appreciation loan and shall include the local public entity’s cash investment, the difference between the price of land provided by the local public entity and the fair market value of the land, the amount of fees waived by the local public entity, and the value of in-kind contributions made by or on behalf of the local public entity. Funds
borrowed by the borrower, the repayment of which are secured by the security property, shall not be included in the calculation of total initial equity of the borrower.

(5) At least 30 days in advance of executing the loan documentation, the borrower receives full disclosure of the terms and conditions of the loan, including the economic consequences to the borrower of the obligation to pay contingent deferred interest.

(b) “Local public entity” means a city and county, or a housing authority or redevelopment agency of a city and county.

(c) “Owner-occupied residence” means real property containing one to four residential units at least one of which at the time the loan is made is, or is to be, occupied by the borrower.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1606, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Shared Appreciation Loans of E.R.I.S.A. Pension Funds [1917.010. - 1917.075.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Findings and Declarations [1917.010. - 1917.010.]

1917.010.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:

(a) It is necessary and essential that the state provide and promote alternative means of supplying affordable housing to the citizens of the state.

(b) High interest rates have caused payment schedules for new long-term, fixed-rate and adjustable-rate mortgages to exceed affordable levels for the vast majority of the state’s households.

(c) Because of current economic conditions,
 including high and volatile interest rates, alternative mortgage instruments must be developed to supplement the standard long-term, fixed-rate mortgage.

(d) Because the interest to which the lender is entitled under a shared appreciation mortgage includes a share of the appreciated value of the property securing the loan, the periodic payments under a shared appreciation mortgage are lower and, therefore, more affordable to borrowers than under a mortgage in which the lender’s interest does not include a share of the appreciated value of the property. State authorization of the shared appreciation loan for pension fund lenders will serve the need to develop alternative and more affordable means of financing the construction of new housing and the subsequent marketing of new homes, and to create vitally needed jobs in the construction industry.

(e) Pension funds may find shared
 appreciation loans suited to their investment needs since yields are keyed to appreciation in property values, which may serve as a hedge against inflation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [1917.020. - 1917.020.]

1917.020.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Adjusted fair market value” means all of the following:

(1) The net sale price, in the case of a bona fide sale made in good faith prior to the maturity date of the shared appreciation loan, but excluding any sale upon a foreclosure or trustee’s sale pursuant to Section 726 of the Code of Civil Procedure or Section 2924.

(2) In all other cases, the amount of value of the property specified in
 the most recent annual appraisal performed pursuant to Section 1917.040 or 1917.042. 

(b) “Borrower’s cost of the property” means the total cost to the borrower incident to the purchase of the property, including documentary transfer taxes, escrow and recording fees, and title insurance premiums.

(c) “Contingent deferred interest” means the sum resulting upon multiplying the net appreciated value by one-third.

(d) “Cost of capital improvements” means the amount of the credit, if any, determined pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 1917.050).

(e) “Lender” means any person who makes a shared appreciation loan on behalf of a pension fund specified in Section 1917.030. Subsequent to an assignment of a shared appreciation loan to a pension fund
 pursuant to Section 1917.030, “lender” shall mean the pension fund assignee (or any subsequent assignee) and its agents designated to service the shared appreciation loan.

(f) “Net appreciated value” means the adjusted fair market value less the sum of the borrower’s cost of the property and the cost of capital improvements. 

(g) “Net sale price” means the gross sale price less expenses of sale actually paid by the borrower, including real estate commissions, advertising, documentary transfer taxes, legal, escrow and recording fees, and title insurance premiums.

(h) “Prevailing rate” means the weighted average yield accepted by the Federal National Mortgage Association in its most recent free market system auction for four-month conventional mortgage commitments or, if the Federal National Mortgage Association alters
 its free market system auction, then the system which is adopted by the Federal National Mortgage Association which substantially replaces or supersedes the present free market system auction for four-month commitments, or if no auction or equivalent thereof has been conducted within the six months immediately preceding the date the application for a shared appreciation mortgage loan is executed, the weighted average cost of funds for the 11th District Savings and Loan Associations as computed by the Federal Home Loan Bank of San Francisco.

(i) “Shared appreciation loan” means any loan made pursuant to this chapter upon the security of owner-occupied real property of a type specified in Section 1917.030, and in connection with which the lender has a right to receive a share of the appreciation in the value of the security property. “Shared appreciation loan” includes a deed of trust and any evidence of debt issued in connection with the
 loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1267, Sec. 1.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Terms and Conditions [1917.030. - 1917.034.]

1917.030.

Lenders may make shared appreciation loans pursuant to this chapter for the purchase of real property improved with one- to four-family dwelling units, including structures ancillary to such dwelling units and including attached single-family dwelling units, single-family mobilehome units placed upon permanent foundations, residential condominium units and dwelling units within a planned unit development. Shared appreciation loans shall be made to finance only owner-occupied dwelling units, but in the case of two- to four-unit dwellings financed under this chapter only one of the units need be owner-occupied. The
 original recipient of a shared appreciation loan shall certify in writing to the lender that he or she will occupy the security property as his or her principal residence, provided that failure to so occupy the security property shall not void a shared appreciation loan, but at the option of the lender the loan may be accelerated in accordance with the terms and conditions provided in the shared appreciation loan. All shared appreciation loans shall be originated by the lender on behalf of a pension fund which is subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (P.L. 93-406, 88 Stat. 829), pursuant to a prior written commitment to purchase the loan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.031.

A shared appreciation loan shall include the following terms and conditions:

(a) The term of the loan, excluding refinancing under Section 1917.033, shall be at least seven years, but not more than 30 years.

(b) The repayment schedule for the loan, excluding refinancing under Section 1917.033, shall be cast so that full amortization of the principal amount of the loan would occur in 30 years, regardless of the actual term of the loan. Any principal balance remaining at maturity shall be due
 and payable at that time, unless refinanced as provided in Section 1917.033. Monthly installment payments shall be equal in amount and in addition to amortization of principal, shall include fixed interest pursuant to subdivision (d).

(c) The loan shall be secured by a deed of trust or mortgage on the real property financed.

(d) The loan shall bear interest at a fixed rate, which shall be one-third below the prevailing rate in effect 90 days prior to the loan closing, or at another date between that date and the loan closing if mutually agreed by the lender and borrower.

(e) The borrower shall additionally be obligated to pay contingent deferred interest in the amount of one-third of the net appreciated value of the real property which secures the loan, at the time the property is sold (including a sale pursuant to a
 land sale contract), when title is transferred, other than a transfer specified in Section 2924.6, when a lease with an option to purchase is entered into, when a partnership is formed which in effect transfers the beneficial ownership to another person, when a trust is created which affects title to the property, upon a judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure sale, at the time the loan is prepaid in full, or upon the maturity of the loan, whichever first occurs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.032.

(a) The borrower shall have the right to prepay, at any time, in full or in part, the principal loan balance of the shared appreciation loan, together with accrued interest, including deferred contingent interest.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a borrower from obligating himself or herself, by an agreement in writing, to pay a prepayment charge, as authorized by this section, upon prepayment of the loan, in full or in part, within five years of the date of execution of the shared appreciation loan.

(c) Any prepayment charge imposed upon the prepayment of a shared appreciation loan shall not exceed the amount authorized and specified in subdivision (b) of Section 2954.9.

(d) No prepayment charge shall be imposed as to any portion of the contingent deferred interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.033.

(a) If the shared appreciation loan is not prepaid in full or the real property securing the loan is not sold or transferred prior to maturity of the loan, the lender shall offer to the original borrower refinancing of the unpaid balance of the loan and all contingent deferred interest.

(b) The term of the refinancing loan shall be at least 30 years from the date of the refinancing, provided that if the interest rate of the refinancing loan is not adjustable or variable during the term of such loan, the loan may contain a call
 provision giving the lender an option to accelerate the principal loan balance making it, together with accrued interest, payable in full at a date specified in the shared appreciation loan, which shall be no earlier than seven years following the date of refinancing under this section. If such a call provision is included in the refinancing loan, a concise description thereof shall be included in upper case print in the disclosures on refinancing required by Section 1917.071.

(c) The interest rate for the refinancing loan shall not exceed the prevailing rate existing at maturity of the shared appreciation loan.

(d) The lender may require as a condition of the refinancing loan that it be secured by a deed of trust or mortgage of first priority on the property financed.

(e) The terms and conditions of refinancing
 pursuant to this section shall be specified in the shared appreciation loan, shall be a part of the shared appreciation loan contract, and shall be subject to the applicable laws in effect on the date of execution of the shared appreciation loan. The refinancing shall be fully amortizing and the interest rate may be either fixed or adjustable as permitted by law for home financing offered by banks or savings and loan associations doing business in this state to the public for financing housing similar to the borrower’s property, provided that nothing in this section shall preclude such other lawful refinancing terms as may be mutually acceptable to the borrower and lender. If the lender offers more than one form of refinancing, the borrower may select from among the types of refinancing offered by the lender.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.034.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the borrower from obtaining any other financing, in lieu of the refinancing provided for in Section 1917.033, including refinancing on other terms that are mutually agreeable to the borrower and lender.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Annual Appraisals [1917.040. - 1917.044.]

1917.040.

The fair market value of the real property securing a shared appreciation loan shall be determined annually as provided in this article. The lender shall select an independent appraiser annually to perform an appraisal of the property subject to a shared appreciation loan. The appraisal shall be performed within 30 days preceding the anniversary date of the loan and a copy of the current appraisal shall be sent by first-class mail to the borrower no later than five days following the anniversary date of the loan, together with a notice informing the borrower that the appraisal will constitute a final and conclusive
 determination of the value of the property for certain purposes and that if the borrower disputes the amount of the appraisal, the borrower may procure an independent appraisal as provided in Section 1917.041. The lender may require the borrower to pay for the cost of the appraisal.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.041.
